North Carolina statutes. Chapter 28A. Administration of Decedents’ Estates.
Article 29. Notice to Creditors Without Estate Administration.

§ 28A-29-1.
Notice to creditors without estate administration.

When (i) a decedent dies testate or intestate leaving no personal property subject to probate and no real property devised to the personal representative; (ii) a decedent’s estate is being administered by collection by affidavit pursuant to Article 25
of this Chapter; (iii) a decedent’s estate is being administered under the summary administration provisions of Article 28 of this Chapter; (iv) a decedent’s estate consists solely of a motor vehicle that can be transferred by the
procedure authorized by

G.S. 20-77(b)

; or (v) a decedent has left assets that may be treated as assets of an estate for limited purposes as described in

G.S. 28A-15-10

, and no application or petition for appointment of a personal representative is pending or has been granted in this State, any person otherwise qualified to serve as personal representative of the estate pursuant to
Article 4 of this Chapter or the trustee then serving under the terms of a revocable trust created by the decedent may file a petition to be appointed as a limited personal representative to provide notice to creditors without administration
of an estate before the clerk of superior court of the county where the decedent was domiciled at the time of death. This procedure is not available if the decedent’s will provides that it is not available. A limited personal representative
shall have the rights and obligations provided for in this Article.

History.
2009-444, s. 1; 2013-91, s. 1(b).

§ 28A-29-2.
Petition.

The application for appointment as limited personal representative shall be in the form of an affidavit sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths, signed by the applicant or the applicant’s attorney, which may be supported by other proof
under oath in writing, all of which shall be recorded and filed by the clerk of superior court, and shall allege all of the following facts:

The name and domicile of the decedent at the time of death.

The date and place of death of the decedent.

That, so far as is known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, (i) the decedent left no personal property subject to probate and no real property devised to the personal representative; (ii) the decedent’s estate is being administered by collection
by affidavit pursuant to Article 25 of this Chapter; (iii) the decedent’s estate is being administered under the summary administration provisions of Article 28 of this Chapter; (iv) the decedent’s estate consists solely
of a motor vehicle that can be transferred by the procedure authorized by

G.S. 20-77(b)

; or (v) the decedent left assets that may be treated as assets of an estate for limited purposes as described in

G.S. 28A-15-10

.

That no application or petition for appointment of a personal representative is pending or has been granted in this State.

If it appears to the clerk of superior court that the application and supporting evidence comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and on the basis thereof the clerk finds that the applicant is entitled to appointment, the clerk
shall issue letters of limited administration.

The petition shall be filed by the clerk upon payment of the fee provided in G.S. 7A-307(a) and shall be indexed in the index to estates.

History.
2009-444, s. 1; 2013-91, s. 1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-91, s. 1(c), effective June 12, 2013, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(3) for the former provisions which read: “That, so far as is known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the decedent’s property is
not subject to probate.”

§ 28A-29-3.
Effect of appointment.

A limited personal representative appointed under this Article shall provide notice to all persons, firms, and corporations having claims against the decedent, and proof of such notice shall be in accordance with the provisions of Article 14 of this Chapter.

History.
2009-444, s. 1.

§ 28A-29-4.
Presentation, payment, and limitation of claims.

Upon compliance with

G.S. 28A-29-3

, creditors of the decedent and the decedent’s property shall present claims in accordance with the provisions of Article 19 of this Chapter, and creditors failing to file such claims shall be barred as provided in

G.S. 28A-19-3

. The limited personal representative shall administer claims so presented in accordance with the procedures and priorities provided pursuant to Article 19 of this Chapter. At any time after a claim is presented in accordance
with the provisions of this section, the clerk may appoint a personal representative to administer the decedent’s estate.

History.
2009-444, s. 1.

§ 28A-29-5.
Right to petition for appointment of personal representative.

Nothing in this Article shall preclude any person qualified to serve as personal representative pursuant to

G.S. 28A-4-1

, including the limited personal representative, from petitioning the clerk of superior court for the appointment of a personal representative to administer the decedent’s estate.

History.
2009-444, s. 1.